Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.235

Consolidation—Petition.

(1) A proposed change in school district organization by consolidation of territory from two or more school districts to form a new school district may be initiated by:

(a) A written petition presented to the educational service district superintendent signed by ten or more registered voters residing:

(i) In each whole district and in each part of a district proposed to be included in any single new district; or

(ii) In the territory of a proposed new district that comprises a part of only one or more districts and approved by the boards of directors of the affected school districts;

(b) A written petition presented to the educational service district superintendent signed by ten percent or more of the registered voters residing in such affected areas or area without the approval of the boards of directors of the affected school districts.

(2) The petition shall state the name and number of each district involved in or affected by the proposal to form the new district and shall describe the boundaries of the proposed new district. No more than one petition for consolidation of the same two school districts or parts thereof shall be considered during a school fiscal year.

(3) The educational service district superintendent may not complete any consolidation of territory under this section unless he or she has first called and held a special election of the voters of the affected districts to afford those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed consolidation. A simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.

(4) If a proposed change in school district organization by consolidation of territory has been approved under this section, the educational service district superintendent shall make an order establishing all approved changes involving the alteration of the boundaries of the affected districts. The order shall also establish all approved terms of the equitable adjustment of assets and liabilities involving the affected districts. The superintendent shall certify his or her action to each county auditor, each county treasurer, each county assessor, and the superintendents of all school districts affected by the action.

[ 1999 c 315 s 601.]